District of Columbia statutes.
13-302

Service by marshal.

Subject to the provisions of law or rules of court for service by other persons, the United States marshal for the District of Columbia or his deputy shall serve the process of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, and the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 513, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 142(3)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 13-302.
1973 Ed., § 13-302.